Vermont, session 2025-2026, H649.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
17 Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 6010 is amended to read:
18 § 6010. LEGALINVESTMENTS
19 * * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 2 of 10
1 (d) No risk retention group shall make a loan to or investment in its parent
2 company or its parent company’s members or affiliates. This prohibition shall
3 not apply to any loan or investment in effect prior to January 1, 2026.
4 Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 6007 is amended to read:
5 § 6007. REPORTS AND STATEMENTS
6 (a) Captive insurance companies shall not be required to make any annual
7 report except as provided in this chapter.
8 (b) Prior to March 1 of each year, and prior to March 15 of each year in the
9 case of pure captive insurance companies, association captive insurance
10 companies, sponsored captive insurance companies, industrial insured captive
11 insurance companies, or agency captive insurance companies, each captive
12 insurance company shall submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial
13 condition, verified by oath of two of its executive officers or, in the case of a
14 captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company or as a
15 reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by the governing board.
16 (c) Each captive insurance company shall report using generally accepted
17 accounting principles, statutory accounting principles, or international
18 financial reporting standards unless the Commissioner requires, approves, or
19 accepts the use of any other comprehensive basis of accounting, in each case
20 with any appropriate or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof
21 required or approved or accepted by the Commissioner for the type of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 3 of 10
1 insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon, and as supplemented by
2 additional information required by the Commissioner. As used in this section,
3 “statutory accounting principles” means the accounting principles codified in
4 the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. Upon application for
5 admission, a captive insurance company shall select, with explanation, an
6 accounting method for reporting. Any change in a captive insurance
7 company’s accounting method shall require prior approval. Except as
8 otherwise provided, each risk retention group shall file its report in the form
9 required by subsection 3561(a) of this title, and each risk retention group shall
10 comply with the requirements set forth in section 3569 of this title.
11 (d) The Commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in which pure
12 captive insurance companies, association captive insurance companies,
13 sponsored captive insurance companies, and industrial insured captive
14 insurance companies shall report. Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall
15 apply to each report filed pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision
16 shall not apply to reports filed by risk retention groups.
17 (c)(e) On or before March 1 of each year, in a form and manner prescribed
18 by the Commissioner, each risk retention group shall file with the National
19 Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) a copy of its annual
20 statement convention blank, the signed jurat page, the actuarial certification,
21 and any other additional filings prescribed by the Commissioner for the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 4 of 10
1 preceding year. Any amendments and addendums to the annual statement
2 filing subsequently filed with the Commissioner shall also be filed with the
3 NAIC.
4 (f) Each year, in a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner, each
5 risk retention group shall file with the NAIC a copy of the quarterly statements
6 exhibiting its condition and affairs for the period beginning on January 1 of the
7 current calendar year through and including the last day of the quarter for
8 which the report is being made. The first quarterly statement shall be filed on
9 or before May 15. The second quarterly statement shall be filed on or before
10 August 15. The third quarterly statement shall be filed on or before November
11 15. If any of the dates specified in this subsection falls on a day other than a
12 business day, then the quarterly statement is due on or before the first business
13 day preceding such date. Information filed with the NAIC shall include a jurat
14 page. A copy of any amendments and addendums to a quarterly statement
15 subsequently filed with the Commissioner shall also be filed with the NAIC.
16 (g) The Commissioner may adopt by rule additional filing requirements for
17 risk retention groups. All risk retention group annual and quarterly financial
18 statements shall be filed electronically with the NAIC.
19 (h) Any pure captive insurance company, association captive insurance
20 company, sponsored captive insurance company, industrial insured captive
21 insurance company, or agency captive insurance company may make written

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 5 of 10
1 application for filing the required report on a fiscal year-end. If an alternative
2 reporting date is granted:
3 (1) the annual report is due 75 days after the fiscal year-end; and
4 (2) in order to provide sufficient detail to support the premium tax
5 return, the captive insurance company shall file prior to March 15 of each year
6 for each calendar year-end, the premium schedule of the “Vermont Captive
7 Insurance Company Annual Report.”
8 (i) Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall apply to each report filed
9 pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision shall not apply to a report
10 filed by a risk retention group.
11 Sec. 3. 8 V.S.A. § 6034i is added to read:
12 § 6034i. CERTIFYING STATEMENT AFTER COMMENCEMENT OF
13 BUSINESS
14 (a) Within 30 days after commencing business, each protected cell shall
15 file with the Commissioner a statement under oath certifying that the protected
16 cell possessed the requisite funding prior to commencing business, including
17 any required collateral in accordance with the protected cell’s approved plan of
18 operation.
19 (b) The statement required by subsection (a) of this section shall be signed
20 by the following:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 6 of 10
1 (1) for an unincorporated protected cell, the president and secretary of
2 the sponsored captive insurance company;
3 (2) for an incorporated protected cell, its president and secretary; and
4 (3) for a protected cell formed as a limited liability company or as a
5 reciprocal insurer, two individuals authorized by the governing board.
6 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
7 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 6010 is amended to read:
§ 6010. LEGAL INVESTMENTS
* * *
(d) No risk retention group shall make a loan to or investment in its
members or affiliates of its members. This prohibition shall not apply to any
loan or investment in effect prior to January 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 6007 is amended to read:
§ 6007. REPORTS AND STATEMENTS
(a) Captive insurance companies shall not be required to make any annual
report except as provided in this chapter.
(b) Prior to March 1 of each year, and prior to March 15 of each year in
the case of pure captive insurance companies, association captive insurance
companies, sponsored captive insurance companies, industrial insured captive
insurance companies, or agency captive insurance companies, each captive

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 7 of 10
insurance company shall submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial
condition, verified by oath of two of its executive officers or, in the case of a
captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company or as a
reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by the governing board.
(c) Each captive insurance company shall report using generally accepted
accounting principles, statutory accounting principles, or international
financial reporting standards unless the Commissioner requires, approves, or
accepts the use of any other comprehensive basis of accounting, in each case
with any appropriate or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof
required or approved or accepted by the Commissioner for the type of
insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon, and as supplemented by
additional information required by the Commissioner. As used in this section,
“statutory accounting principles” means the accounting principles codified in
the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. Upon application for
admission, a captive insurance company shall select, with explanation, an
accounting method for reporting. Any change in a captive insurance
company’s accounting method shall require prior approval. Except as
otherwise provided, each risk retention group shall file its report in the form
required by subsection 3561(a) of this title, and each risk retention group shall
comply with the requirements set forth in section 3569 of this title.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 8 of 10
(d) The Commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in which pure
captive insurance companies, association captive insurance companies,
sponsored captive insurance companies, and industrial insured captive
insurance companies shall report. Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall
apply to each report filed pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision
shall not apply to reports filed by risk retention groups.
(c)(e) On or before March 1 of each year, in a form and manner prescribed
by the Commissioner, each risk retention group shall file with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) a copy of its annual statement
convention blank, the signed jurat page, the actuarial certification, and any
other additional filings prescribed by the Commissioner for the preceding year.
Any amendments and addendums to the annual statement filing subsequently
filed with the Commissioner shall also be filed with the NAIC.
(f) Each year, in a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner, each
risk retention group shall file with the NAIC a copy of the quarterly statements
exhibiting its condition and affairs for the period beginning on January 1 of
the current calendar year through and including the last day of the quarter for
which the report is being made. The first quarterly statement shall be filed on
or before May 15. The second quarterly statement shall be filed on or before
August 15. The third quarterly statement shall be filed on or before November
15. If any of the dates specified in this subsection falls on a day other than a

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 9 of 10
business day, then the quarterly statement is due on or before the first business
day preceding such date. Information filed with the NAIC shall include a jurat
page. A copy of any amendments and addendums to a quarterly statement
subsequently filed with the Commissioner shall also be filed with the NAIC.
(g) The Commissioner may adopt by rule additional filing requirements for
risk retention groups. All risk retention group annual and quarterly financial
statements shall be filed electronically with the NAIC.
(h) Any pure captive insurance company, association captive insurance
company, sponsored captive insurance company, industrial insured captive
insurance company, or agency captive insurance company may make written
application for filing the required report on a fiscal year-end. If an alternative
reporting date is granted:
(1) the annual report is due 75 days after the fiscal year-end; and
(2) in order to provide sufficient detail to support the premium tax
return, the captive insurance company shall file prior to March 15 of each year
for each calendar year-end, the premium schedule of the “Vermont Captive
Insurance Company Annual Report.”
(i) Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall apply to each report filed
pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision shall not apply to a
report filed by a risk retention group.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.649
2026 Page 10 of 10
Sec. 3. 8 V.S.A. § 6034i is added to read:
§ 6034i. CERTIFYING STATEMENT AFTER COMMENCEMENT OF
BUSINESS
(a) Within 30 days after commencing business, each protected cell shall file
with the Commissioner a statement under oath or affirmation certifying that
the protected cell possessed the requisite funding prior to commencing
business, including any required collateral in accordance with the protected
cell’s approved plan of operation.
(b) The statement required by subsection (a) of this section shall be signed
by the following:
(1) for an unincorporated protected cell, the president and secretary of
the sponsored captive insurance company;
(2) for an incorporated protected cell, its president and secretary; and
(3) for a protected cell formed as a limited liability company or as a
reciprocal insurer, two individuals authorized by the governing board.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.